Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB483.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 164 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, it shall not be a
defense or immunity to any action brought against an employee or agent of a
public postsecondary education institution in his or her official capacity that the
employee or agent:
(a) Acted in good faith and within the scope of his or her employment or
authority in exercising discretion and judgment or personal deliberation in
performing an act or omission;
(b) Believed, reasonably or otherwise, that his or her conduct was lawful at the
time when it was committed; or
(c) Deprived legal rights, privileges, or immunities, by an act or omission, that
were not clearly established at the time of their deprivation, or that the state
of the law was otherwise such that the employee or agent could not
reasonably have been expected to know whether his or her conduct was
lawful.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to an employee or agent of public
postsecondary education institution who is acting in his or her official capacity as
a law enforcement officer as defined in KRS 15.310.
Section 2. KRS 164.6949 is amended to read as follows:
Nothing in KRS 164.6941 to 164.6951 shall be interpreted as:
(1) Waiving the immunity of any public postsecondary educational institution[ or its
employees, agents, or authorized volunteers];
(2) Granting name, image, or likeness rights or requiring compensation for the use of
the name, image, or likeness of any student-athlete prior to March 9, 2022;
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/6/2025 4:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1030
(3) Establishing student-athletes as employees or independent contractors of an
institution or an association; or
(4) Modifying the powers or waiving the rules or regulations of the Kentucky Board of
Education or the agency designated to manage interscholastic athletics under KRS
156.070.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/6/2025 4:11 PM Jacketed